Nevada, session 83, AB200.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 616A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. “Average monthly prevailing wage” means the
prevailing wage as determined in the manner provided in NRS
338.030, that is applicable to the region and trade in which a
construction worker who is a skilled mechanic, skilled worker,
semiskilled mechanic, semiskilled worker or unskilled worker was
employed on the date of the accident or injury to that construction
worker for an average number of hours in a month worked by that
construction worker, as determined pursuant to the method
established pursuant to section 5 of this act.
Sec. 3. “Construction worker” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 618.957.
Sec. 4. NRS 616A.025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616A.025 As used in chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, of
NRS, unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms
defined in NRS 616A.030 to 616A.360, inclusive, and sections 2
and 3 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
-
*AB200*

– 3 –
Sec. 5. Chapter 616C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Administrator shall provide by regulation for a method
of determining average monthly prevailing wage.
2. The method established pursuant to subsection 1 must
provide that:
(a) The hourly rate applied to the average number of hours
worked as a construction worker in a month by an injured
construction worker who is a skilled mechanic, skilled worker,
semiskilled mechanic, semiskilled worker or unskilled worker
must be the prevailing wage, as determined in the manner
provided in NRS 338.030, that is applicable to the region and trade
in which that construction worker was employed on the date of the
accident or injury, regardless of whether the construction worker
was employed on a public work that is subject to chapter 338 of
NRS.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a history
of hours worked as a construction worker for a period of 12 weeks
must be used to calculate an average monthly prevailing wage.
(c) If a 12-week period of hours worked as a construction
worker is not representative of the average number of hours
worked as a construction worker in a month by the injured
employee, hours worked as a construction worker over a period of
1 year or the full period of employment, if it is less than 1 year,
may be used. Hours worked as a construction worker over 1 year
or the full period of employment, if it is less than 1 year, must be
used if the average monthly prevailing wage would be increased.
(d) If a construction worker who is injured is a member of a
labor organization and is regularly employed by referrals from the
office of that organization, hours worked as a construction worker
for all employers for a period of 1 year may be used. A period of 1
year using all the hours worked as a construction worker by the
injured employee from all his or her employers must be used if the
average monthly prevailing wage would be increased.
(e) If information concerning hours worked as a construction
worker is not available for a period of 12 weeks, hours worked as a
construction worker may be averaged for the available period, but
not for a period of less than 4 weeks.
(f) If information concerning hours worked as a construction
worker is unavailable for a period of at least 4 weeks, average
monthly prevailing wage must be projected using the working
schedule which the injured construction worker was projected to
work as a construction worker.
(g) If the methods of determining an average number of hours
worked as a construction worker pursuant to paragraphs (b) to (f),
-
*AB200*

– 4 –
inclusive, cannot be applied reasonably and fairly, an average
monthly prevailing wage must be calculated by the insurer at 100
percent of:
(1) The sum which reasonably represents the average
monthly prevailing wage of the injured construction worker, as
defined in regulations adopted pursuant to this section, at the time
the injury or illness occurs; or
(2) The amount determined using the prevailing wage, as
determined in the manner provided in NRS 338.030, that is
applicable to the region and trade in which the construction
worker was employed on the date the injury or illness occurs,
regardless of whether the construction worker was employed on a
public work that is subject to chapter 338 of NRS, and the
projected working schedule which the injured construction worker
was projected to work as a construction worker.
3. In determining average monthly prevailing wage pursuant
to subsection 1, the method must include hours worked in
concurrent employment of the injured construction worker only if
the concurrent employment is employment by one or more
employers who are insured for workers’ compensation or
government disability benefits by:
(a) A private carrier;
(b) A plan of self-insurance;
(c) A workers’ compensation insurance system operating
under the laws of any other state or territory of the United States;
or
(d) A workers’ compensation or disability benefit plan
provided and administered by the Federal Government or any
agency thereof.
4. Except as otherwise provided by subsection 3, concurrent
employment includes, without limitation, hours worked in:
(a) Active or reserve duty with or in:
(1) The Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps or Coast
Guard of the United States;
(2) The Merchant Marine; or
(3) The National Guard; or
(b) Employment by:
(1) The Federal Government or any branch or agency
thereof;
(2) A state, territorial, county, municipal or local
government of any state or territory of the United States; or
(3) A private employer, whether the employment is full-
time, part-time, temporary, periodic, seasonal or otherwise limited
in term, or pursuant to contract.
-
*AB200*

– 5 –
5. As used in this section, “concurrent employment” means
work as a construction worker performed by an employee for two
or more employers during the 1-year period immediately preceding
the date of injury or the onset of occupational disease.
Sec. 6. NRS 616C.427 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.427 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 3
of NRS 616C.315 and except as otherwise provided in this section,
if an injured employee is receiving compensation based on a
calculation of the average monthly wage or average monthly
prevailing wage of the injured employee as determined pursuant to
the regulations adopted by the Administrator pursuant to NRS
616C.420 [,] or section 5 of this act, as applicable, the injured
employee or the employer may request a hearing before a hearing
officer pursuant to the provisions of NRS 616C.315 to 616C.385,
inclusive, asking for a recalculation of the average monthly wage or,
if applicable, the average monthly prevailing wage of the injured
employee.
2. The injured employee is entitled to have his or her average
monthly wage or, if applicable, average monthly prevailing wage
recalculated if the injured employee proves by a preponderance of
the evidence that the insurer calculated the average monthly wage or
average monthly prevailing wage improperly or incorrectly as a
result of:
(a) The use of any improper or incorrect information or
methodology;
(b) The failure to use any proper or correct information or
methodology;
(c) Any error of law or fact; or
(d) Any other error, omission, neglect or wrongful act.
3. If the injured employee proves that the insurer calculated his
or her average monthly wage or, if applicable, average monthly
prevailing wage improperly or incorrectly, resulting in an
underpayment of compensation:
(a) The insurer shall:
(1) Increase the injured employee’s future compensation
based on the correct average monthly wage [;] or average monthly
prevailing wage, as applicable; and
(2) Pay the injured employee a lump sum in an amount equal
to the underpayment of compensation for the period during which
the insurer was using the incorrect average monthly wage [;] or
average monthly prevailing wage, as applicable; and
(b) The remedy provided in paragraph (a) is the sole remedy for
the underpayment and the insurer is not subject to the imposition of
any fine or benefit penalty therefor.
-
*AB200*

– 6 –
4. If the hearing officer determines that the calculation of the
average monthly wage or, if applicable, average monthly
prevailing wage resulted in an overpayment of compensation, the
insurer may require the injured employee to repay to the insurer an
amount equal to the overpayment received by the injured employee
during any one 30-day period.
5. The average monthly wage or average monthly prevailing
wage, as applicable, of an injured employee may not be challenged
by the insurer, the employer or the injured employee after the date
on which any portion of an award for permanent partial disability is
paid or the claim closes, whichever occurs first.
6. The provisions of this section do not apply if the issue of the
average monthly wage or, if applicable, average monthly
prevailing wage of the injured employee was previously adjudicated
to a final decision in:
(a) A hearing before a hearing officer or appeals officer pursuant
to the provisions of NRS 616C.315 to 616C.385, inclusive; or
(b) Any proceedings for judicial review.
Sec. 7. NRS 616C.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.440 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 616C.175, every employee in the employ of an employer,
within the provisions of chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, of NRS,
who is injured by accident arising out of and in the course of
employment, or his or her dependents as defined in chapters 616A
to 616D, inclusive, of NRS, is entitled to receive the following
compensation for permanent total disability:
(a) In cases of total disability adjudged to be permanent,
compensation per month of 66 2/3 percent of :
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2), the
average monthly wage [.] ; or
(2) For an injured employee who is a construction worker,
the greater of the average monthly wage or the average monthly
prevailing wage.
(b) If there is a previous disability, as the loss of one eye, one
hand, one foot or any other previous permanent disability, the
percentage of disability for a subsequent injury must be determined
by computing the percentage of the entire disability and deducting
therefrom the percentage of the previous disability as it existed at
the time of the subsequent injury, but such a deduction for a
previous award for permanent partial disability must be made in a
reasonable manner and must not be more than the total amount
which was paid for the previous award for permanent partial
disability. The total amount of the allowable deduction includes,
without limitation, compensation for a permanent partial disability
that was deducted from:
-
*AB200*

– 7 –
(1) Any compensation the employee received for a
temporary total disability; or
(2) Any other compensation received by the employee.
(c) If the character of the injury is such as to render the
employee so physically helpless as to require the service of a
constant attendant, an additional allowance may be made so long as
such requirements continue, but the allowance may not be made
while the employee is receiving benefits for care in a hospital or
facility for intermediate care pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 616C.265.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.028 and
616B.029, an injured employee or his or her dependents are not
entitled to accrue or be paid any benefits for a permanent total
disability during the time the injured employee is incarcerated. The
injured employee or his or her dependents are entitled to receive
those benefits when the injured employee is released from
incarceration if the injured employee is certified as permanently
totally disabled by a physician or chiropractic physician.
3. An employee is entitled to receive compensation for a
permanent total disability only so long as the permanent total
disability continues to exist. The insurer has the burden of proving
that the permanent total disability no longer exists.
4. If an injured employee has filed a claim with an insurer
pursuant to NRS 617.455, 617.457, 617.485 or 617.487, the insurer
may not terminate, suspend, withhold, offset, reduce or otherwise
halt, restrict or limit the payment of compensation for a permanent
total disability to the injured employee or his or her dependents on
the basis that the injured employee earns income.
5. If an employee who has received compensation in a lump
sum for a permanent partial disability pursuant to NRS 616C.495 is
subsequently determined to be permanently and totally disabled, the
insurer of the employee’s employer shall recover pursuant to this
subsection the actual amount of the lump sum paid to the employee
for the permanent partial disability. The insurer shall not recover
from the employee, whether by deductions or single payment, or a
combination of both, more than the actual amount of the lump sum
paid to the employee. To recover the actual amount of the lump
sum, the insurer shall:
(a) Unless the employee submits a request described in
paragraph (b), deduct from the compensation for the permanent total
disability an amount that is not more than 10 percent of the rate of
compensation for a permanent total disability until the actual
amount of the lump sum paid to the employee for the permanent
partial disability is recovered; or
-
*AB200*

– 8 –
(b) Upon the request of the employee, accept in a single
payment from the employee an amount that is equal to the actual
amount of the lump sum paid to the employee for the permanent
partial disability, less the actual amount of all deductions made to
date by the insurer from the employee for repayment of the lump
sum.
Sec. 8. NRS 616C.475 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.475 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
NRS 616C.175 and 616C.390, every employee in the employ of an
employer, within the provisions of chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, of NRS, who is injured by accident arising out of and in
the course of employment, or his or her dependents, is entitled to
receive for the period of temporary total disability, 66 2/3 percent
of :
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the average
monthly wage [.] ; or
(b) For an injured employee who is a construction worker, the
greater of the average monthly wage or the average monthly
prevailing wage.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.028 and
616B.029, an injured employee or his or her dependents are not
entitled to accrue or be paid any benefits for a temporary total
disability during the time the injured employee is incarcerated. The
injured employee or his or her dependents are entitled to receive
such benefits when the injured employee is released from
incarceration if the injured employee is certified as temporarily
totally disabled by a physician or chiropractic physician.
3. If a claim for the period of temporary total disability is
allowed, the first payment pursuant to this section must be issued by
the insurer within 14 working days after receipt of the initial
certification of disability and regularly thereafter.
4. Any increase in compensation and benefits effected by the
amendment of subsection 1 is not retroactive.
5. Payments for a temporary total disability must cease when:
(a) A physician or chiropractic physician determines that the
employee is physically capable of any gainful employment for
which the employee is suited, after giving consideration to the
employee’s education, training and experience;
(b) The employer offers the employee light-duty employment or
employment that is modified according to the limitations or
restrictions imposed by a physician or chiropractic physician
pursuant to subsection 7; or
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616B.028 and
616B.029, the employee is incarcerated.
-
*AB200*

– 9 –
6. Each insurer may, with each check that it issues to an injured
employee for a temporary total disability, include a form approved
by the Division for the injured employee to request continued
compensation for the temporary total disability.
7. A certification of disability issued by a physician or
chiropractic physician must:
(a) Include the period of disability and a description of any
physical limitations or restrictions imposed upon the work of the
employee;
(b) Specify whether the limitations or restrictions are permanent
or temporary; and
(c) Be signed by the treating physician or chiropractic physician
authorized pursuant to NRS 616B.527 or appropriately chosen
pursuant to subsection 4 or 5 of NRS 616C.090.
8. If the certification of disability specifies that the physical
limitations or restrictions are temporary, the employer of the
employee at the time of the employee’s accident may offer
temporary, light-duty employment to the employee. If the employer
makes such an offer, the employer shall confirm the offer in writing
within 10 days after making the offer. The making, acceptance or
rejection of an offer of temporary, light-duty employment pursuant
to this subsection does not affect the eligibility of the employee to
receive vocational rehabilitation services, including compensation,
and does not exempt the employer from complying with NRS
616C.545 to 616C.575, inclusive, and 616C.590 or the regulations
adopted by the Division governing vocational rehabilitation
services. Any offer of temporary, light-duty employment made by
the employer must specify a position that:
(a) Is substantially similar to the employee’s position at the time
of his or her injury in relation to the location of the employment and
the hours the employee is required to work;
(b) Provides a gross wage that is:
(1) If the position is in the same classification of
employment, equal to the gross wage the employee was earning at
the time of his or her injury; or
(2) If the position is not in the same classification of
employment, substantially similar to the gross wage the employee
was earning at the time of his or her injury; and
(c) Has the same employment benefits as the position of the
employee at the time of his or her injury.
Sec. 9. NRS 616C.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.490 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.175,
every employee, in the employ of an employer within the provisions
of chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, of NRS, who is injured by an
accident arising out of and in the course of employment is entitled to
-
*AB200*

– 10 –
receive the compensation provided for permanent partial disability.
As used in this section, “disability” and “impairment of the whole
person” are equivalent terms.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Within 30 days after receiving from a physician or
chiropractic physician a report indicating that the injured employee
may have suffered a permanent disability and is stable and ratable,
the insurer shall schedule an appointment with the rating physician
or chiropractic physician selected pursuant to this subsection to
determine the extent of the employee’s disability.
(b) Unless the insurer and the injured employee otherwise agree
to a rating physician or chiropractic physician:
(1) The insurer shall select the rating physician or
chiropractic physician from the list of qualified rating physicians
and chiropractic physicians designated by the Administrator, to
determine the percentage of disability in accordance with the
American Medical Association’s Guides to the Evaluation of
Permanent Impairment as adopted and supplemented by the
Division pursuant to NRS 616C.110.
(2) Rating physicians and chiropractic physicians must be
selected at random from the list of qualified physicians and
chiropractic physicians designated by the Administrator unless the
physician or chiropractic physician who is selected is currently an
employee of the insurer making the selection, in which case another
random selection must be made until a physician or chiropractic
physician who is not currently an employee of the insurer is
selected.
(3) A rating physician or chiropractic physician selected
pursuant to subparagraph (1) or (2) may decline the selection if he
or she believes he or she does not have the ability to rate the
disability at issue.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an injured
employee or the legal representative of an injured employee may, at
any time, without limitation, request that the Administrator select a
rating physician or chiropractic physician from the list of qualified
physicians and chiropractic physicians designated by the
Administrator. The Administrator, upon receipt of the request, shall
immediately select for the injured employee the rating physician or
chiropractic physician at random from the list.
4. If an insurer contacts a treating physician or chiropractic
physician to determine whether an injured employee has suffered a
permanent disability, the insurer shall deliver to the treating
physician or chiropractic physician that portion or a summary of that
portion of the American Medical Association’s Guides to the
Evaluation of Permanent Impairment as adopted by the Division
-
*AB200*

– 11 –
pursuant to NRS 616C.110 that is relevant to the type of injury
incurred by the employee.
5. At the request of the insurer, the injured employee shall,
before an evaluation by a rating physician or chiropractic physician
is performed, notify the insurer of:
(a) Any previous evaluations performed to determine the extent
of any of the employee’s disabilities; and
(b) Any previous injury, disease or condition sustained by the
employee which is relevant to the evaluation performed pursuant to
this section.
 The notice must be on a form approved by the Administrator and
provided to the injured employee by the insurer at the time of the
insurer’s request.
6. Unless the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 616C.110
provide otherwise, a rating evaluation must include an evaluation of
the loss of motion, sensation and strength of an injured employee
if the injury is of a type that might have caused such a loss. Except
in the case of claims accepted pursuant to NRS 616C.180, no factors
other than the degree of physical impairment of the whole person
may be considered in calculating the entitlement to compensation
for a permanent partial disability.
7. The rating physician or chiropractic physician shall provide
the insurer with his or her evaluation of the injured employee. After
receiving the evaluation, the insurer shall, within 14 days, provide
the employee with a copy of the evaluation and notify the employee:
(a) Of the compensation to which the employee is entitled
pursuant to this section; or
(b) That the employee is not entitled to benefits for permanent
partial disability.
8. Each 1 percent of impairment of the whole person must be
compensated by a monthly payment:
(a) Of 0.5 percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for
injuries sustained before July 1, 1981;
(b) Of 0.6 percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for
injuries sustained on or after July 1, 1981, and before June 18, 1993;
(c) Of 0.54 percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for
injuries sustained on or after June 18, 1993, and before January 1,
2000; [and]
(d) [Of] Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), of 0.6
percent of the claimant’s average monthly wage for injuries
sustained on or after January 1, 2000 [.] ; and
(e) For a claimant who is a construction worker, of 0.6 percent
of the greater of the claimant’s average monthly wage or average
monthly prevailing wage for injuries sustained on or after
October 1, 2025.
-
*AB200*

– 12 –
 Compensation must commence on the date of the injury or the
day following the termination of temporary disability compensation,
if any, whichever is later, and must continue on a monthly basis for
5 years or until the claimant is 70 years of age, whichever is later.
9. Compensation benefits may be paid annually to claimants
who will be receiving less than $100 a month.
10. If there is a previous disability, the percentage of disability
for a subsequent injury must be determined pursuant to
NRS 616C.099.
11. In the event of a dispute over an award of compensation for
permanent partial disability, the insurer shall commence making
installment payments to the injured employee for that portion of the
award that is not in dispute:
(a) Not later than the date by which such payment is required
pursuant to subsection 8 or 9, as applicable; and
(b) Without requiring the injured employee to make an election
whether to receive his or her compensation in installment payments
or in a lump sum.
12. The Division may adopt schedules for rating permanent
disabilities resulting from injuries sustained before July 1, 1973, and
reasonable regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
13. The increase in compensation and benefits effected by the
amendment of this section is not retroactive for accidents which
occurred before July 1, 1973.
14. This section does not entitle any person to double payments
for the death of an employee and a continuation of payments for a
permanent partial disability, or to a greater sum in the aggregate
than if the injury had been fatal.
15. The Administrator shall prepare and publish on the Internet
website of the Division an annual report which contains:
(a) The name of each rating physician or chiropractic physician
who was selected in the immediately preceding year to conduct an
evaluation to determine the extent of an employee’s disability
pursuant to this section; and
(b) For each rating physician or chiropractic physician identified
pursuant to paragraph (a):
(1) The number of times the rating physician or chiropractic
physician was selected to conduct an evaluation to determine the
extent of an employee’s disability; and
(2) The number of evaluations that the rating physician or
chiropractic physician completed.
Sec. 10. NRS 616C.495 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.495 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 616C.380,
an award for a permanent partial disability may be paid in a lump
sum under the following conditions:
-
*AB200*

– 13 –
(a) A claimant injured on or after July 1, 1973, and before
July 1, 1981, who incurs a disability that does not exceed 12 percent
may elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum. A
claimant injured on or after July 1, 1981, and before July 1, 1995,
who incurs a disability that does not exceed 30 percent may elect to
receive his or her compensation in a lump sum.
(b) The spouse, or in the absence of a spouse, any dependent
child of a deceased claimant injured on or after July 1, 1973, who is
not entitled to compensation in accordance with NRS 616C.505, is
entitled to a lump sum equal to the present value of the deceased
claimant’s undisbursed award for a permanent partial disability.
(c) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 1981, and before
July 1, 1995, who incurs a disability that exceeds 30 percent may
elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum equal to the
present value of an award for a disability of 30 percent. If the
claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to this paragraph,
the insurer shall pay in installments to the claimant that portion of
the claimant’s disability in excess of 30 percent.
(d) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 1995, and before
January 1, 2016, who incurs a disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 25 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 25 percent may:
(I) Elect to receive his or her compensation in a lump sum
equal to the present value of an award for a disability of 25 percent.
If the claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to this sub-
subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in installments to the claimant
that portion of the claimant’s disability in excess of 25 percent.
(II) To the extent that the insurer has offered to provide
compensation in a lump sum up to the present value of an award for
disability of 30 percent, elect to receive his or her compensation in a
lump sum up to the present value of an award for a disability of 30
percent. If the claimant elects to receive compensation pursuant to
this sub-subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in installments to the
claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability in excess of 30
percent.
(e) Any claimant injured on or after January 1, 2016, and before
July 1, 2017, who incurs a disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 30 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 30 percent may elect to receive his or her
compensation in a lump sum equal to the present value of an award
for a disability of 30 percent. If the claimant elects to receive
compensation pursuant to this subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in
-
*AB200*

– 14 –
installments to the claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability
in excess of 30 percent.
(f) Any claimant injured on or after July 1, 2017, who incurs a
disability that:
(1) Does not exceed 30 percent may elect to receive his or
her compensation in a lump sum.
(2) Exceeds 30 percent may elect to receive his or her
compensation in a lump sum equal to the present value of an award
for a disability of up to 30 percent. If the claimant elects to receive
compensation pursuant to this subparagraph, the insurer shall pay in
installments to the claimant that portion of the claimant’s disability
in excess of 30 percent.
(g) If the permanent partial disability rating of a claimant
seeking compensation pursuant to this section would, when
combined with any previous permanent partial disability rating of
the claimant that resulted in an award of benefits to the claimant,
result in the claimant having a total permanent partial disability
rating in excess of 100 percent, the claimant’s disability rating upon
which compensation is calculated must be reduced by such
percentage as required to limit the total permanent partial disability
rating of the claimant for all injuries to not more than 100 percent.
2. If the claimant elects to receive his or her payment for a
permanent partial disability in a lump sum pursuant to subsection 1,
all of the claimant’s benefits for compensation terminate. Except as
otherwise provided in paragraph (d), the claimant’s acceptance of
that payment constitutes a final settlement of all factual and legal
issues in the case. By so accepting the claimant waives all of his or
her rights regarding the claim, including the right to appeal from the
closure of the case or the percentage of his or her disability, except:
(a) The right of the claimant to:
(1) Reopen his or her claim in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 616C.390; or
(2) Have his or her claim considered by his or her insurer
pursuant to NRS 616C.392;
(b) Any counseling, training or other rehabilitative services
provided by the insurer;
(c) The right of the claimant to receive a benefit penalty in
accordance with NRS 616D.120; and
(d) The right of the claimant to conclude or resolve any
contested matter which is pending at the time that the claimant
executes his or her election to receive his or her payment for a
permanent partial disability in a lump sum. The provisions of this
paragraph do not apply to:
(1) The scope of the claim;
(2) The claimant’s stable and ratable status; and
-
*AB200*

– 15 –
(3) The claimant’s average monthly wage [.] or, if
applicable, average monthly prevailing wage.
3. The claimant, when he or she demands payment in a lump
sum pursuant to subsection 2, must be provided with a written
notice which prominently displays a statement describing the effects
of accepting payment in a lump sum of an entire permanent partial
disability award, any portion of such an award or any uncontested
portion of such an award, and that the claimant has 20 days after the
mailing or personal delivery of the notice within which to retract or
reaffirm the demand, before payment may be made and the
claimant’s election becomes final.
4. Any lump-sum payment which has been paid on a claim
incurred on or after July 1, 1973, must be supplemented if necessary
to conform to the provisions of this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the total
lump-sum payment for disablement must not be less than one-half
the product of the average monthly wage multiplied by the
percentage of disability. In the case of a claimant who is a
construction worker, the total lump-sum payment for disablement
must not be less than one-half the product of the greater of the
average monthly wage or average monthly prevailing wage
multiplied by the percentage of disability. If the claimant received
compensation in installment payments for his or her permanent
partial disability before electing to receive payment for that
disability in a lump sum, the lump-sum payment must be calculated
for the remaining payment of compensation.
6. The lump sum payable must be equal to the present value of
the compensation awarded, less any advance payment or lump sum
previously paid. The present value must be calculated using monthly
payments in the amounts prescribed in subsection 8 of NRS
616C.490 and actuarial annuity tables adopted by the Division. The
tables must be reviewed annually by a consulting actuary and must
be adjusted accordingly on July 1 of each year by the Division
using:
(a) The most recent unisex “Static Mortality Tables for Defined
Benefit Pension Plans” published by the Internal Revenue Service;
and
(b) The average 30-Year Treasury Constant Maturity Rate for
March of the current year as reported by the Board of Governors of
the Federal Reserve System.
7. To calculate the present value of a lump sum payable to a
claimant, the insurer shall use the actuarial annuity tables adopted
by the Division that are in effect on the date on which the claimant
elects payment in a lump sum.
-
*AB200*

– 16 –
8. If a claimant would receive more money by electing to
receive compensation in a lump sum than the claimant would if he
or she receives installment payments, the claimant may elect to
receive the lump-sum payment.
Sec. 11. NRS 616C.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
616C.505 If an injury by accident arising out of and in the
course of employment causes the death of an employee in the
employ of an employer, within the provisions of chapters 616A to
616D, inclusive, of NRS, the compensation is known as a death
benefit and is payable as follows:
1. In addition to any other compensation payable pursuant to
chapters 616A to 616D, inclusive, of NRS, burial expenses are
payable in an amount not to exceed $10,000, plus the cost of
transporting the remains of the deceased employee. When the
remains of the deceased employee and the person accompanying the
remains are to be transported to a mortuary or mortuaries, the charge
of transportation must be borne by the insurer.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, to the
surviving spouse of the deceased employee, 66 2/3 percent of :
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the average
monthly wage ; or
(b) If the deceased employee was a construction worker, the
greater of the average monthly wage or average monthly
prevailing wage,
 is payable until the death of the surviving spouse.
3. If there is a surviving spouse and any surviving children of
the deceased employee who are not the children of the surviving
spouse, the compensation otherwise payable pursuant to subsection
2 must be paid as follows until the entitlement of all children of the
deceased employee to receive compensation pursuant to this
subsection ceases:
(a) To the surviving spouse, 50 percent of the death benefit is
payable until the death of the surviving spouse; and
(b) To each child of the deceased employee, regardless of
whether the child is the child of the surviving spouse, the child’s
proportionate share of 50 percent of the death benefit and, except as
otherwise provided in subsection 11, if the child has a guardian, the
compensation the child is entitled to receive may be paid to the
guardian.
4. In the event of the subsequent death of the surviving spouse:
(a) Each surviving child of the deceased employee, in addition
to any amount the child may be entitled to pursuant to subsection 3,
must share equally the compensation theretofore paid to the
surviving spouse but not in excess thereof, and it is payable until the
youngest child reaches the age of 18 years.
-
*AB200*

– 17 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 11, if the
children have a guardian, the compensation they are entitled to
receive may be paid to the guardian.
5. If there are any surviving children of the deceased employee
under the age of 18 years, but no surviving spouse, then each such
child is entitled to his or her proportionate share of 66 2/3 percent
of :
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the average
monthly wage ; or
(b) If the deceased employee was a construction worker, the
greater of the average monthly wage or average monthly
prevailing wage,
 for the support of the child.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, if there is no
surviving spouse or child under the age of 18 years, there must be
paid:
(a) To a parent, if wholly dependent for support upon the
deceased employee at the time of the injury causing the death of the
deceased employee, 33 1/3 percent of :
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2), the
average monthly wage [.] ; or
(2) If the deceased employee was a construction worker, the
greater of the average monthly wage or average monthly
prevailing wage.
(b) To both parents, if wholly dependent for support upon the
deceased employee at the time of the injury causing the death of the
deceased employee, 66 2/3 percent of :
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2), the
average monthly wage [.] ; or
(2) If the deceased employee was a construction worker, the
greater of the average monthly wage or average monthly
prevailing wage.
(c) To each brother or sister until he or she reaches the age of 18
years, if wholly dependent for support upon the deceased employee
at the time of the injury causing the death of the deceased employee,
his or her proportionate share of 66 2/3 percent of :
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2), the
average monthly wage [.] ; or
(2) If the deceased employee was a construction worker, the
greater of the average monthly wage or average monthly
prevailing wage.
7. The aggregate compensation payable pursuant to subsection
6 must not exceed 66 2/3 percent of :
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the average
monthly wage [.] ; or
-
*AB200*

– 18 –
(b) If the deceased employee was a construction worker, the
greater of the average monthly wage or average monthly
prevailing wage.
8. In all other cases involving a question of total or partial
dependency:
(a) The extent of the dependency must be determined in
accordance with the facts existing at the time of the injury.
(b) If the deceased employee leaves dependents only partially
dependent upon the earnings of the deceased employee for support
at the time of the injury causing his or her death, the monthly
compensation to be paid must be equal to the same proportion of the
monthly payments for the benefit of persons totally dependent as the
amount contributed by the deceased employee to the partial
dependents bears to the average monthly wage or, in the case of a
deceased employee who was a construction worker, the average
monthly prevailing wage, of the deceased employee at the time of
the injury resulting in his or her death.
(c) The duration of compensation to partial dependents must be
fixed in accordance with the facts shown, but may not exceed
compensation for 100 months.
9. Compensation payable to a surviving spouse is for the use
and benefit of the surviving spouse and the dependent children, and
the insurer may, from time to time, apportion such compensation
between them in such a way as it deems best for the interest of all
dependents.
10. In the event of the death of any dependent specified in this
section before the expiration of the time during which compensation
is payable to the dependent, funeral expenses are payable in an
amount not to exceed $10,000.
11. If a dependent is entitled to receive a death benefit pursuant
to this section and is less than 18 years of age or incapacitated, the
legal representative of the dependent shall petition for a guardian to
be appointed for that dependent pursuant to NRS 159.044 or
159A.044, as applicable. An insurer shall not pay any compensation
in excess of $3,000, other than burial expenses, to the dependent
until a guardian is appointed and legally qualified. Upon receipt of a
certified letter of guardianship, the insurer shall make all payments
required by this section to the guardian of the dependent until the
dependent is emancipated, the guardianship terminates or the
dependent reaches the age of 18 years, whichever occurs first,
unless paragraph (a) of subsection 12 is applicable. The fees and
costs related to the guardianship must be paid from the estate of the
dependent. A guardianship established pursuant to this subsection
must be administered in accordance with chapter 159 or 159A of
NRS, as applicable, except that after the first annual review required
-
*AB200*

– 19 –
pursuant to NRS 159.176 or 159A.176, as applicable, a court may
elect not to review the guardianship annually. The court shall review
the guardianship at least once every 3 years. As used in this
subsection, “incapacitated” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 159.019.
12. Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (b), the
entitlement of any child to receive his or her proportionate share of
compensation pursuant to this section ceases when the child dies,
marries or reaches the age of 18 years. A child is entitled to continue
to receive compensation pursuant to this section if the child is:
(a) Over 18 years of age and incapable of supporting himself or
herself, until such time as the child becomes capable of supporting
himself or herself; or
(b) Over 18 years of age and enrolled as a full-time student in an
accredited vocational or educational institution, until the child
reaches the age of 22 years.
13. As used in this section, “surviving spouse” means a
surviving person who was married to the employee at the time of the
employee’s death.
Sec. 12. The amendatory provisions of this act apply
prospectively only with respect to claims which are open or filed on
or after October 1, 2025.
Sec. 13. 1. This section and section 12 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 11, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB200*